Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.231

Limitation on use of funds.

(1) An amount not to exceed five percent of the funds available for the Washington conservation corps may be expended on agency administrative costs.

(2) An amount not to exceed twenty percent of the funds available for the Washington conservation corps may be expended for costs included in subsection (1) of this section and program support costs.

(3) A minimum of eighty percent of the funds available for the Washington conservation corps shall be expended for corps member salaries and benefits and for direct supervision of corps members.

(4) Consistent with any fund source requirements, any state agency using federal funds to sponsor fee-for-service Washington conservation corps crews must contract with the Washington department of veterans affairs for at least five percent of the federal funding to sponsor veteran conservation corps crews operating under RCW 43.60A.150. This requirement applies statewide.

[ 2011 c 20 s 9; 1999 c 280 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.